apertium-mrj-fin.mrj.lexc
LEXICON PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM
%<pl%>%<abe%>:влӓде K ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>влӓм K ;
%<pl%>%<com%>:%>влӓге K ;
%<pl%>%<comp%>:%>влӓлӓ K ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>влӓлӓн K ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>влӓн K ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>влӓшкӹ K ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>влӓш K ;
%<pl%>%<ine%>:%>влӓштӹ K ;
%<pl%>%<lat%>:%>влӓэш K ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>влӓ K ;

LEXICON N_ПОЧТА !!= @CODE@  почта:почта
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE ;
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: 	  K	; 

LEXICON N_ОЛМА !!= @CODE@  олма:олма
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE ;
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: 	  K	; 
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:эм K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:эмвлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:мвлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg1%>:влӓэм K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:эт K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:этвлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:твлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg2%>:влӓэт K ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg3%>:%>эшЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;

LEXICON N_ӒВӒ !!= @CODE@  ӓвӓ:ӓвӓ
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE ;
%<n%>:%^KIN NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: 	  K	; 
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:эм K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:м K ; !! Special
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:эмвлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:мвлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg1%>:влӓэм K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:эт K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:т K ; !! Special
%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:этвлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:твлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg2%>:влӓэт K ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg3%>:%>эшЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>Ы1н K ; ! 
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>Ы1м K ; !
%<sg%>%<com%>:%>ге K ; ! (with a village)
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>лА1н K ; !
%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>Ы1штЫ1 K ; ! (in a village)
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>Ы1шкЫ1 K ; ! (to a village)
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>Ы1ш K ; ! (to a village)
%<sg%>%<lat%>:%>Е2ш K ; ! (into a village)
%<sg%>%<comp%>:%>лА1 K ; ! (like a village)
%<sg%>%<abe%>:%>де K ; ! (without a village)
!!
%<pl%>%<nom%>:влӓ 	  K	; 
%<pl%>%<gen%>:влӓ%>Ы1н K ; ! 
%<pl%>%<acc%>:влӓ%>Ы1м K ; !
%<pl%>%<com%>:влӓ%>ге K ; ! (with a village)
%<pl%>%<dat%>:влӓ%>лА1н K ; !
%<pl%>%<ine%>:влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1 K ; ! (in a village)
%<pl%>%<ill%>:влӓ%>Ы1шкЫ1 K ; ! (to a village)
%<pl%>%<ill%>:влӓ%>Ы1ш K ; ! (to a village)
%<pl%>%<lat%>:влӓ%>Е2ш K ; ! (into a village) 
%<pl%>%<comp%>:влӓ%>лА1 K ; ! (like a village)
%<pl%>%<abe%>:влӓ%>де K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON N_01
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>Ы1н K ; ! 
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>Ы1м K ; !
%<sg%>%<com%>:%>ге K ; ! (with a village)
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>лА1н K ; !
%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>Ы1штЫ1 K ; ! (in a village)
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>Ы1шкЫ1 K ; ! (to a village)
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>Ы1ш K ; ! (to a village)
%<sg%>%<lat%>:%>Е2ш K ; ! (into a village)
%<sg%>%<comp%>:%>лА1 K ; ! (like a village)
%<sg%>%<abe%>:%>де K ; ! (without a village)
!!
%<pl%>%<nom%>:влӓ 	  K	; 
%<pl%>%<gen%>:влӓ%>Ы1н K ; ! 
%<pl%>%<acc%>:влӓ%>Ы1м K ; !
%<pl%>%<com%>:влӓ%>ге K ; ! (with a village)
%<pl%>%<dat%>:влӓ%>лА1н K ; !
%<pl%>%<ine%>:влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1 K ; ! (in a village)
%<pl%>%<ill%>:влӓ%>Ы1шкЫ1 K ; ! (to a village)
%<pl%>%<ill%>:влӓ%>Ы1ш K ; ! (to a village)
%<pl%>%<lat%>:влӓ%>Е2ш K ; ! (into a village) 
%<pl%>%<comp%>:влӓ%>лА1 K ; ! (like a village)
%<pl%>%<abe%>:влӓ%>де K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA
!! PxSg1%<nb%>%<case%>
!! singular possessa
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>Е2м K ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>Е3м%>Ы1н K ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>Е3м%>Ы1м K ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<com%>:%>Е3м%>ге K ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>Е3м%>лА1н K ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<comp%>:%>Е3м%>лА1 K ;
!!
%<sg%>%<ine%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Ы1штем K ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Ы1шкем K ;
%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Ы1шкем K ;

!!
!     кол%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: [колем, колэм] # х2 колэмжӹ
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>Е2м		   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>Е3м%>Ы1н	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>Е3м%>Ы1м	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<com%>:%>Е3мге	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>Е3м%>лА1н	   K  ;
%<sg%>%<ine%>%<pxsg1%>:%>ыштем	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>Е3м%>Ы1штЫ2	   K  ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Ы1шкем	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>Е3м%>Ы1шкЫ2	   K  ;
%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Е3шем	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<lat%>:%>Е3мӹш	   K  ;
%<sg%>%<comp%>%<pxsg1%>:%>лА1эм      K  ;
%<sg%>%<abe%>%<pxsg1%>:%>деэм	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:%>Е3мде	   K  ;
! plural possessa
%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg1%>:%>влӓэм	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>Е2мвлӓ	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>Е3мвлӓн	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>Е3мвлӓм	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>Е3мвлӓге   K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg1%>%<com%>:%>влӓэмге	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg1%>%<dat%>:%>влӓэмлӓн   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>Е3мвлӓлӓн  K  ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>%<pxsg1%>:%>влӓлӓнем   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>Е3мвлӓлӓ   K  ;
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxsg1%>:%>влӓштем    K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:%>Е3мвлӓштӹ  K  ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxsg1%>:%>влӓшкем	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>Е3мвлӓшкӹ  K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>Е3мвлӓш  K  ;
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxsg1%>:влӓштем	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxsg1%>:влӓшкем	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<lat%>%<pxsg1%>:влӓэшем	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<lat%>:%>Е3мвлӓэш   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<lat%>:%>Е3мвлӓш   K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg1%>%<comp%>:влӓэмлӓ	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<comp%>%<pxsg1%>:влӓлӓэм	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<comp%>:%>Е3мвлӓлӓ  K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg1%>%<abe%>:влӓэмде	   K  ;
%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:%>Е3мвлӓде   K  ;

!!PxSg2
 PXSG2-SG-ABE 		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-ACC 		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-COM 		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-COMP 		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-DAT		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-GEN 		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-ILL		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-INE		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-LAT		   ;
 PXSG2-SG-NOM 		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-ABE 		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-ACC 		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-COM 		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-COMP 		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-DAT		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-GEN 		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-ILL		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-INE		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-LAT		   ;
 PXSG2-PL-NOM 		   ;

!!PxSg3
 PXSG3-SG-ABE 		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-ACC 		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-COM 		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-COMP 		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-DAT		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-GEN 		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-ILL		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-INE		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-LAT		   ;
 PXSG3-SG-NOM 		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-ABE 		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-ACC 		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-COM 		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-COMP 		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-DAT		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-GEN 		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-ILL		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-INE		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-LAT		   ;
 PXSG3-PL-NOM 		   ;

!!PxPl1
 PXPL1-SG-ABE 		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-ACC 		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-COM 		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-COMP 		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-DAT		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-GEN 		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-ILL		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-INE		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-LAT		   ;
 PXPL1-SG-NOM 		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-ABE 		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-ACC 		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-COM 		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-COMP 		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-DAT		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-GEN 		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-ILL		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-INE		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-LAT		   ;
 PXPL1-PL-NOM 		   ;

!!PxPl2
 PXPL2-SG-ABE 		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-ACC 		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-COM 		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-COMP 		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-DAT		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-GEN 		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-ILL		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-INE		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-LAT		   ;
 PXPL2-SG-NOM 		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-ABE 		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-ACC 		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-COM 		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-COMP 		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-DAT		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-GEN 		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-ILL		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-INE		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-LAT		   ;
 PXPL2-PL-NOM 		   ;
!!PxPl3
 PXPL3-SG-ABE 		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-ACC 		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-COM 		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-COMP 		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-DAT		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-GEN 		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-ILL		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-INE		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-LAT		   ;
 PXPL3-SG-NOM 		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-ABE 		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-ACC 		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-COM 		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-COMP 		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-DAT		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-GEN 		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-ILL		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-INE		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-LAT		   ;
 PXPL3-PL-NOM 		   ;


LEXICON PXSG2-SG-ABE 
%<sg%>%<abe%>%<pxsg2%>:%>деэт	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:%>Е3тде	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-ACC 
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>Е3тӹм	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-COM 
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<com%>:%>Е3тге	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-COMP
%<sg%>%<comp%>%<pxsg2%>:%>лА1эт      K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<comp%>:%>Е3тлӓ     K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-DAT 
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>Е3тлӓн	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-GEN 
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>Е3тӹн	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-ILL 
%<sg%>%<ill%>%<pxsg2%>:%>Ы1шкет	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>Е3тӹшкӹ	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>Е3тӹш	   K  ;

LEXICON nouns
авансцена:авансцена N_ПОЧТА   ; !"proscenium"
авиапочта:авиа#почта N_ПОЧТА   ; !"lentoposti"
алава:алава N_ОЛМА   ; !"?!"
ама:ама N_ОЛМА   ; !"saukko"
аныжа:аныжа N_ОЛМА   ; !"?!"
арата:арата N_ОЛМА   ; !"ikkunakehys"
арма:арма N_ОЛМА   ; !"sepalus"
ачыла:ачыла N_ОЛМА   ; !"koliikki"
варака:варака N_ОЛМА   ; !""
вешлӓ:вешлӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"airo"
висӓ:висӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"vaaka"
вредӓ:вредӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"vahinko"
вӓрӓ:вӓрӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"seiväs"
вӓшӓлкӓ:вӓшӓлкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"tähteet"
вӹдкыва:вӹдкыва N_ОЛМА   ; !"sukeltajakuoriainen"
вӹдӹлкӓ:вӹдӹлкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"käärö"
границӓ:границӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"raja"
декада:декада N_ОЛМА   ; !"dekadi"
доска:доска N_ОЛМА   ; !"taulu"
жатка:жатка N_ОЛМА   ; !"elonleikkuukone"
задвижкӓ:задвижкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"salpa"
игӹлицӓ:игӹлицӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"kiila"
изимеленӓ:изимеленӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"räiskäle"
иксӓ:иксӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"jolma"
иӓ:иӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"haltia"
йыдалвидӓ:йыдалвидӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"?!х"
йӓригӓ:йӓригӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"kalaverkko"
йӓрцӓ:йӓрцӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"surimo"
йӹлгӓ:йӹлгӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"ruohikko"
кадилӓ:кадилӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"suitsutusastia"
казна:казна N_ОЛМА   ; !"rahasto"
камбала:камбала N_ОЛМА   ; !"kampela"
кандилкӓ:кандилкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
капцака:капцака N_ОЛМА   ; !"peltipala"
каршака:каршака N_ОЛМА   ; !"kumpu"
каса:каса N_ОЛМА   ; !"jäännös"
кизӓ:кизӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"käsi"
кишкӓ:кишкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"suoli"
клечӓ:клечӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"raajarikko"
кобура:кобура N_ОЛМА   ; !"pistoolikotelo"
когопапа:когопапа N_ОЛМА   ; !""
койка:койка N_ОЛМА   ; !""
колбаса:колбаса N_ОЛМА   ; !""
контра:контра N_ОЛМА   ; !""
коса:коса N_ОЛМА   ; !""
коча:коча N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кригӓ:кригӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кружка:кружка N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кугидара:кугидара N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кукурка:кукурка N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кутузка:кутузка N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кынзала:кынзала N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кырыска:кырыска N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кӓкӓ:кӓкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"mustelma"
кӓшкӓ:кӓшкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кӧрӓгӓ:кӧрӓгӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кӱкшикӓ:кӱкшикӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кӹнӓ:кӹнӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кӹрмӓшӓ:кӹрмӓшӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
кӹшкӹсӹнзӓ:кӹшкӹсӹнзӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
лаксикӓ:лаксикӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
лапа:лапа N_ОЛМА   ; !"kämmen"
лапта:лапта N_ОЛМА   ; !""
лепкӓ:лепкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
лоца:лоца N_ОЛМА   ; !""
лынзыра:лынзыра N_ОЛМА   ; !""
лӧнгӓ:лӧнгӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
лӱлперлӓ:лӱлперлӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
маклака:маклака N_ОЛМА   ; !""
марьясергӓ:марьясергӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
мацала:мацала N_ОЛМА   ; !""
межӓ:межӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
мелсергӓ:мелсергӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
метелцӓ:метелцӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
морда:морда N_ОЛМА   ; !""
мушка:мушка N_ОЛМА   ; !""
мӧскӓ:мӧскӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !"karhu"
неркӓ:неркӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
ньызгата:ньызгата N_ОЛМА   ; !""
овуца:овуца N_ОЛМА   ; !""
олица:олица N_ОЛМА   ; !""
опонга:опонга N_ОЛМА   ; !""
охыра:охыра N_ОЛМА   ; !""
пакилӓ:пакилӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
паталца:паталца N_ОЛМА   ; !""
пенуга:пенуга N_ОЛМА   ; !""
пивырса:пивырса N_ОЛМА   ; !""
платинӓ:платинӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
пока:пока N_ОЛМА   ; !""
почингӓ:почингӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
почта:почта N_ПОЧТА   ; !""
прӓчука:прӓчука N_ОЛМА   ; !""
пыйта:пыйта N_ОЛМА   ; !""
пӓрцӓ:пӓрцӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
пӱгӓцӓ:пӱгӓцӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
роза:роза N_ОЛМА   ; !""
рӹмӓкӓ:рӹмӓкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
сарта:сарта N_ОЛМА   ; !""
селтекӓ:селтекӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
сеткӓ:сеткӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
слуга:слуга N_ОЛМА   ; !""
стенӓ:стенӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
стёкла:стёкла N_ОЛМА   ; !""
сытона:сытона N_ОЛМА   ; !""
таблеткӓ:таблеткӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
товыра:товыра N_ОЛМА   ; !""
треска:треска N_ОЛМА   ; !""
тумолма:тумолма N_ОЛМА   ; !""
тымаша:тымаша N_ОЛМА   ; !""
тютюра:тютюра N_ОЛМА   ; !""
тӓзӹлӓ:тӓзӹлӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
уа:уа N_ОЛМА   ; !""
хала:хала N_ОЛМА   ; !""
хына:хына N_ОЛМА   ; !"vieras"
цемерӓ:цемерӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
цыварка:цыварка N_ОЛМА   ; !""
цӓрлӓнгӹдӓ:цӓрлӓнгӹдӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
цӹкмӓ:цӹкмӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
шага:шага N_ОЛМА   ; !""
шеренга:шеренга N_ОЛМА   ; !""
шотка:шотка N_ОЛМА   ; !""
шӓклякӓ:шӓклякӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
шӱнгӓ:шӱнгӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
ыжга:ыжга N_ОЛМА   ; !""
эрзӓ:эрзӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
ягыжа:ягыжа N_ОЛМА   ; !""
ӓвӓ:ӓвӓ N_ӒВӒ   ; !"äiti"
ӓйӓкӓ:ӓйӓкӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
ӓтмӓ:ӓтмӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
ӱэлӓ:ӱэлӓ N_ОЛМА   ; !""
